District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.18

Prosecution and punishment of offenses.

(a)

Any violation of § 10-503.16(a), and any attempt to commit any such violation, shall be a felony punishable by a fine not exceeding $5,000, or imprisonment not exceeding 5 years, or both.

(b)

Any violation of § 10-503.12, § 10-503.13, § 10-503.14, § 10-503.15, § 10-503.16(b), or § 10-503.17, and any attempt to commit any such violation, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding $500, or imprisonment not exceeding 6 months, or both.

(c)

Violations of this part, including attempts or conspiracies to commit such violations, shall be prosecuted by the United States Attorney or his assistants in the name of the United States. None of the general laws of the United States and none of the laws of the District of Columbia shall be superseded by any provision of this part. Where the conduct violating this part, also violates the general laws of the United States or the laws of the District of Columbia, both violations may be joined in a single prosecution. Prosecution for any violation of § 10-503.16(a) or for conduct which constitutes a felony under the general laws of the United States or the laws of the District of Columbia shall be in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia. All other prosecutions for violations of this part may be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. Whenever any person is convicted of a violation of this part and of the general laws of the United States or the laws of the District of Columbia, in a prosecution under this subsection, the penalty which may be imposed for such violation is the highest penalty authorized by any of the laws for violation of which the defendant is convicted.

History

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 719, ch. 707, § 8
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Oct. 20, 1967, 81 Stat. 277, Pub. L. 90-108, § 1(c)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-114.
1973 Ed., § 9-125.